Massachusetts, session 194th, H756.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after 
Section 2NNN, as inserted by section 50 of chapter 43 of the Acts of 1997, the following new 
section:— 
Section 2OOO. There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth 
a separate fund to be known as the Senior Citizens and Disabled Persons Abuse Prevention Fund. 
There shall be credited to said fund all revenues which are generated under the provisions of 
section 4 of chapter 93A which are in excess of any such revenues which were collected during 
each fiscal year. Amounts credited to said fund shall be available for expenditure, subject to 
appropriation, to  

of 3 10  (1) prepare and distribute educational materials to inform senior citizens, disabled 
persons and other citizens of the commonwealth regarding consumer protection laws and 
consumer rights that are of particular interest to senior citizens or disabled persons, and  
(2) to underwrite educational seminars and other forms of education and projects 
designed to explain deceptive investment or marketing practices which have historically targeted 
senior citizens and disabled persons. 
SECTION 2. Section 1 of Chapter 93A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting the following paragraphs:— 
(e) “Senior Citizen”, a person who is at least 65 years of age. 
(f) “Persons with disabilities”, a person who has a physical or mental impairment which 
substantially limits one or more fundamental life activities. For the purposes of this paragraph, 
“physical or mental impairment” shall include such diseases or conditions as orthopedic, visual, 
speech and hearing impairment, cancer, heart disease, diabetes, mental retardation, and 
emotional illness; “fundamental life activities” shall include activities such as caring for one’s 
self, performing annual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning and 
working. 
SECTION 3. Section 4 of chapter 93A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting the following at the end of the first paragraph:—  
“The court may also require such person to pay to the Commonwealth an additional civil 
penalty of not more than $2,500 for each such violation if the court finds that each violation was 
perpetrated against one or more senior citizens or persons with disabilities. 

of 3 31  In determining whether to impose the additional civil penalty pursuant to this section and 
the amount thereof, the court shall consider, in addition to any other appropriate factors, the 
extent to which one or more of the following factors are present: 
(1) Whether the defendant knew or should have known that his or her conduct was 
directed at one or more senior citizens or persons with disabilities. 
(2) Whether the defendant’s conduct caused one or more senior citizens or persons with 
disabilities to suffer: loss or encumbrance of a primary residence, principal employment, or 
source of income; substantial loss of property or assets set aside or held for retirement or for 
personal or family care and maintenance; substantial loss of payments received under a pension 
or retirement plan or a government benefits program; or assets essential to the health or welfare 
of the senior citizens or persons with disabilities. 
(3) Whether one or more senior citizens or persons with disabilities are substantially 
more vulnerable than other members of the public to the defendant’s conduct because of age, 
poor health or infirmity, impaired understanding, restricted mobility, or disability, and actually 
suffered substantial physical, emotional or economic damage resulting from the defendant’s 
conduct.”